Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part VIII Miscellaneous Provisions

7-11-801.
Scope of chapter.

Sections

7-11-201

,

7-11-301

,

7-11-307

,

7-11-501

,

7-11-502

,

7-11-505

, and

7-11-605

apply to a person who offers to sell a security if:

An offer to sell is made in this state; or

An offer to purchase is made and accepted in this state.

Sections

7-11-201

,

7-11-307

,

7-11-501

,

7-11-502

, and

7-11-505

apply to a person who purchases or offers to purchase a security if:

An offer to purchase is made in this state; or

An offer to sell is made and accepted in this state.

For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell or to purchase is made in this state, whether or not either person is present in this state, if the offer:

Originates in this state; or

Is directed by the offeror to a destination in this state and received where it is directed, or at a post office in this state if the offer is mailed.

For the purpose of this section, an offer to purchase or to sell is accepted in this state if acceptance:

Is communicated to the offeror in this state; and

Has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in writing, outside this state. Acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state, whether or not either person is present in this state, if the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the offeror is in this state and it is received where it is directed, or at a post office in this state if an acceptance is mailed.

For the purpose of subsections (a) through (d), an offer to sell or to purchase made in a newspaper or other publication of general, regular, and paid circulation is not made in this state if the publication:

Is not published in this state; or

Is published in this state, but has had more than two-thirds (2/3) of its circulation outside this state during the past twelve (12) months.

For the purpose of subsection (e), if a publication is published in editions, each edition is a separate publication except for material common to all editions.

For the purpose of subsections (a) through (d), an offer to sell or to purchase made in a radio or television program or other electronic communication received in this state that originates outside this state is not made in this state.

For the purposes of subsection (g), a radio or television program or other electronic communication is considered as having originated in this state if either the broadcast studio or the originating source of transmission is located in this state; unless:

The program or communication is syndicated and distributed from outside this state for redistribution to the general public in this state;

The program or communication is supplied by a radio, television, or other electronic network with the electronic signal originating from outside this state for redistribution to the general public in this state;

The program or communication is an electronic signal that originates outside this state and is captured for redistribution to the general public in this state by a community antenna or cable, radio, cable television, or other electronic system; or

The program or communication consists of an electronic signal that originates in this state, but which is not intended for redistribution to the general public in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-802.
Contract provisions.

No person subject to this chapter who makes or engages in the performance of a contract in violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter, or who acquires a right under a contract with knowledge of the facts by which its making or performance is in violation, may obtain relief on the contract.

A provision in a contract entered into or effective in this state, binding a person acquiring a security to waive compliance with this chapter or a rule or order of the chapter under this chapter is nonenforceable. A provision in a contract containing an agreement to arbitrate or a choice of law provision in a contract between persons all of whom are engaged in the securities business is not a provision waiving compliance with this chapter and is enforceable in accordance with its terms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-803.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it and to coordinate the interpretation and administration of this chapter with the related federal laws and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-804.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Rhode Island Uniform Securities Act (1990).

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-805.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-806.
Repeal and saving provisions.

Law repealed by this chapter exclusively governs a suit, action, prosecution, or proceeding that is pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before July 12, 1990, but no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under the law repealed by this chapter unless brought within the earlier of the period of limitation that applied when the claim for relief accrued or two (2) years after July 12, 1990.

All effective registrations under the law repealed by this chapter, all administrative orders relating to those registrations, and all conditions imposed upon those registrations remain in effect for as long as they would have remained in effect if this chapter had not been enacted. They are considered to have been filed, issued, or imposed under this chapter, but are governed by the law repealed by this chapter.

The law repealed by this chapter applies to an offer to sell or sale made within one year after July 12, 1990 pursuant to an offering begun in good faith before July 12, 1990 on the basis of an exemption available under the law repealed by this chapter.

Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted before July 12, 1990 are governed by the state administrative procedures act but no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition for review is filed within the earlier of the period of limitation that applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered or sixty (60) days after July 12, 1990.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.